es: Estilo de boquilla de pistola de pegamento: Punta en ángulo; Boquilla extendida (larga); Punta fina (precisión); Puntas intercambiables; Punta estándar; Esparcidor ancho; Otro
sv: Typ av limpistolmunstycke: Vinklad spets; Förlängt (långt) munstycke; Fin spets (precision); Utbytbara spetsar; Standardspets; Bred spridare; Annan
el: Στυλ ακροφυσίου πιστολιού θερμοκόλλησης: Γωνιακή μύτη; Εκτεταμένο (μακρύ) ακροφύσιο; Λεπτή μύτη (ακριβείας); Εναλλάξιμες μύτες; Τυπική μύτη; Φαρδιά μύτη; Άλλο
fr: Type de buse du pistolet à colle: Embout biseauté; Buse allongée (longue); Embout fin (précision); Embouts interchangeables; Embout standard; Épandeur large; Autre
zh-CN: 胶枪喷嘴式: 弯头; 加长（长）喷嘴; 细头（精密）; 可互换喷头; 标准喷头; 宽面涂抹器; 其他
nl: Lijmpistool spuitmondstijl: Gebogen punt; Verlengde (lange) spuitmond; Fijne punt (precisie); Verwisselbare punten; Standaard punt; Brede spreider; Anders
it: Ugello per pistola per colla a caldo: Punta angolata; Ugello esteso (lungo); Punta fine (precisione); Punte intercambiabili; Punta standard; Spalmatore largo; Altro
ja: グルーガンノズルスタイル: 角度付きチップ; 延長 (ロング) ノズル; 細字チップ (精密); 交換可能チップ; 標準チップ; ワイドスプレッダー; その他
da: Dysetype til limpistol: Vinklet spids; Forlænget (lang) dyse; Fin spids (præcision); Udskiftelige spidser; Standardspids; Bred spreder; Anden
pt-BR: Estilo do bico da pistola de cola: Ponta angular; Bico estendido (longo); Ponta fina (precisão); Pontas intercambiáveis; Ponta padrão; Espalhador largo; Outro
pl: Styl dyszy pistoletu do kleju: Końcówka kątowa; Przedłużona (długa) dysza; Cienka końcówka (precyzyjna); Wymienne końcówki; Standardowa końcówka; Szeroka końcówka rozprowadzająca; Inny
en: Glue gun nozzle style: Angled tip; Extended (long) nozzle; Fine tip (precision); Interchangeable tips; Standard tip; Wide spreader; Other
hr-HR: Stil mlaznice pištolja za ljepilo: Nakošeni vrh; Produžena (duga) mlaznica; Fini vrh (precizni); Izmjenjivi vrhovi; Standardni vrh; Široki nastavak za razmazivanje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на дюзата на пистолета за лепило: Накрайник под ъгъл; Удължен (дълъг) накрайник; Фин накрайник (прецизен); Сменяеми накрайници; Стандартен накрайник; Широк накрайник за разнасяне; Друго
zh-TW: 熱熔膠槍噴嘴樣式: 斜角噴嘴; 加長型噴嘴; 細長噴嘴 (精密型); 可替換噴嘴; 標準噴嘴; 寬扁出膠口; 其他
ko: 글루건 노즐 유형: 앵글 팁; 확장(롱) 노즐; 파인 팁(정밀); 교체형 팁; 표준 팁; 와이드 스프레더; 기타
vi: Kiểu đầu vòi súng bắn keo: Đầu vát góc; Vòi kéo dài (dài); Đầu mảnh (chính xác); Đầu thay thế được; Đầu tiêu chuẩn; Đầu tán rộng; Khác
ro-RO: Stilul duzei pistolului de lipit: Vârf înclinat; Duză extinsă (lungă); Vârf fin (precizie); Vârfuri interschimbabile; Vârf standard; Aplicare lată; Altele
ru: Тип сопла клеевого пистолета: Угловой наконечник; Удлиненная насадка; Тонкий наконечник (прецизионный); Сменные наконечники; Стандартный наконечник; Широкий распределитель; Другое
pt-PT: estilo do bico da pistola de cola: Ponta angular; Bocal alongado (comprido); Ponta fina (precisão); Pontas intercambiáveis; Ponta padrão; Espalhador largo; Outro
hu: Ragasztópisztoly fúvóka stílusa: Hajlított hegy; Hosszított (hosszú) fúvóka; Finom hegy (precíziós); Cserélhető hegyek; Normál hegy; Széles kenőfej; Egyéb
fi: Liimapistoolin suuttimen tyyppi: Viisto kärki; Pidennetty (pitkä) suutin; Hieno kärki (tarkkuus); Vaihdettavat kärjet; Vakiokärki; Leveä levitin; Muu
tr: Yapıştırıcı tabancası uç tasarımı: Açılı uç; Uzatılmış (uzun) uç; İnce uç (hassas); Değiştirilebilir uçlar; Standart uç; Geniş yayıcı; Diğer
sk-SK: Štýl dýzy lepiacej pištole: Zahnutý hrot; Predĺžená (dlhá) tryska; Jemný hrot (presný); Vymeniteľné hroty; Štandardný hrot; Široký rozotierač; Iné
de: Art der Heißklebepistolendüse: Abgewinkelte Spitze; Verlängerte (lange) Düse; Feine Spitze (Präzision); Austauschbare Spitzen; Standardspitze; Breiter Spachtel; Andere
sl-SI: Stil šobe na pištoli za lepilo: Nagnjena konica; Podaljšana (dolga) šoba; Tanka konica (natančna); Zamenljive konice; Standardna konica; Širok nastavek za razmazovanje; Drugo
nb: Limpistoldyse-stil: Vinklet tupp; Forlenget (lang) dyse; Fin tupp (presisjon); Utskiftbare tupper; Standardtupp; Bred spreder; Annet
th: รูปแบบหัวฉีดปืนกาว: หัวทำมุม; หัวฉีดยาว (พิเศษ); หัวปลายแหลม (แม่นยำสูง); หัวแบบเปลี่ยนได้; หัวมาตรฐาน; หัวเกลี่ยกว้าง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Klijų pistoleto antgalio stilius: Kampuotas antgalis; Pailgintas (ilgas) antgalis; Smulkus antgalis (tikslus); Keičiami antgaliai; Standartinis antgalis; Platus paskirstymo antgalis; Kita
cs: Styl trysky lepicí pistole: Zkosená špička; Prodloužená (dlouhá) tryska; Jemná špička (precizní); Výměnné špičky; Standardní špička; Široký roztírač; Ostatní